California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(A) A device or delivery system sold in combination with any liquid substance containing nicotine that can be used to deliver to a person nicotine in aerosolized or vaporized form, including, but not limited to, an e-cigarette,
 e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, or e-hookah.

(B) A component, part, or accessory of a device described in subparagraph (A) that is used during the operation of the device if sold in combination with a liquid substance containing nicotine.

(C) A liquid or substance containing nicotine, whether sold separately or sold in combination with any device, that could be used to deliver to a person nicotine in aerosolized or vaporized form.

(2) “Electronic cigarette” does not include a product that has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product or for other therapeutic purposes if that product is marketed and sold solely for that approved use.

(d) “In this state” means within the exterior limits of California and includes all territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(e) “Purchase” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6010.

(f) “Purchaser” means a person who purchases electronic cigarettes in a retail sale.

(g) (1) “Retailer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6015.

 (2) “Retailer”
 includes a person that operates vending machines from which electronic cigarettes are sold in this state or a person conducting a sale regulated by Section 22963 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) “Retail sale” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6007.

(i) “Sales price” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6011.

(j) “Use” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31002.

(a) (1) (A) Beginning July 1, 2022, a purchaser shall pay a tax on the purchase for use in this state of an electronic cigarette from a retailer at the rate of 12.5 percent of the sales price of
 the electronic
 cigarette.

(B) There is a rebuttable presumption that an electronic cigarette is purchased for use in this state if either of the following is true:

(i) The electronic cigarette is purchased from a retailer physically located in this state.

(ii) The address to which the retailer ships the purchased electronic cigarette is located in this state.

(2) A retailer shall collect the tax
 imposed by this part from the
 purchaser at the time of the retail sale of an electronic cigarette.

(b) A retailer shall include the amount of the tax imposed by this part in any price marketing on any sign or display inside or outside a licensed brick and mortar establishment.

(c) (1) The department shall collect the tax imposed by this part pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001)).

(2) For purposes of this
 part,
 the references in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “fee” shall include the tax imposed by this part, and references to “feepayer” shall include any retailer liable for the payment, pursuant to subdivision (d),
 of the tax imposed by this part.

(3) A retailer may retain 1 percent of the tax imposed by this part as reimbursement for all costs associated with collection of the tax and shall transmit the remainder of the tax to the department pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the tax imposed by this part shall be due and payable quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter.

(2) (A) The payments shall be accompanied by a return filed by the retailer using electronic media on or before the last day of the month following each quarterly period for the preceding quarterly period.

(B) Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(3) The department may require the payment of the tax imposed by this part and the filing of returns for other than quarterly periods.

(e) The tax that is required to be collected by the retailer and any amount unreturned to the
 purchaser which is not tax but was collected from the purchaser under the representation by the retailer that it was tax constitutes debts owed by the retailer to the state.

(f) A retailer subject to the provisions of this part shall register for a permit with the department using electronic media and shall set forth the name under which it transacts or intends to transact business and any other information as the department may require.

(g) (1) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of this part, including, but not limited to, collections, reporting, refunds, and appeals.

(2) (A) The department may prescribe, adopt, and enforce emergency regulations as necessary to implement this part.

(B) An emergency regulation prescribed, adopted, or enforced pursuant to this paragraph shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including
 Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31003.

For each retail sale of an electronic cigarette, a retailer shall provide a purchaser with a receipt or other document that sets out and separately identifies the “California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax” and the amount paid by the purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31004.

(a) (1) The department may, upon a hearing, revoke or suspend one or more of the permits held by a person pursuant to this part after giving the person 10 days’ notice in writing specifying the time and place of the hearing and requiring the person to show cause why the person’s permit or permits should not be revoked if any of the following is true:

(A) A person fails to comply with a provision of this part or any rule or regulation of the department prescribed and adopted under this part.

(B) A person’s seller’s permit has been suspended or revoked under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001).

(C) A person’s license has been suspended or revoked under Division 8.6 (commencing with Section 22970) of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) The department shall give to the person written notice of the suspension or revocation of any of the person’s permits held pursuant to this part.

 (b) The notice required by subdivision (a) shall be served personally or by mail in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency
 determination under Section 55061.

(c) The department shall not issue a new permit after the revocation of a permit pursuant to this section unless it is satisfied that the former holder of the permit will comply with the provisions of this part and any rule or regulation of the department adopted pursuant to this part.

(d) A person whose permit held pursuant to this part has been previously suspended or revoked shall pay the department a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the issuance of a permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31005.

(a) All revenues, interest, and penalties derived from the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax shall be deposited into the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, less payments for refunds and reimbursement to the department for expenses incurred in the administration and collection of the tax.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code and subject to subdivision (d), all amounts in the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year as follows:

(1) Eighteen percent of the moneys to the Health Education Account, established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of
 Section 30122, for tobacco control programs described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 104350) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Twelve percent of the moneys into the California Children and Families Trust Fund created by Section 30131.

(3) (A) Forty-eight percent of the moneys to fund the Medi-Cal Physicians and Dentists Loan Repayment Program (Section 14114 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(B) Of the moneys described by subparagraph (A), 70 percent shall
 be allocated to the physician payment pool and 30 percent to the dentist payment pool.

(4) Five percent of the moneys to the Department of Health Care Access and Information to fund the Health Professions Career Opportunity Program described by Section 127885 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) Seven percent of the moneys to the University of California to support the joint program in medical education between the University of California San Francisco (UCSF) School of Medicine, UCSF Fresno, and the University of California, Merced, including, but not limited to, using funds to establish new residency and clinical rotation positions for program participants and graduates in the San Joaquin Valley.

(6) Ten percent of the moneys to the Small and Rural Hospital Relief Fund established in Section 130077 of the Health and
 Safety Code.

(c) (1) The department shall transmit the funds, pursuant to subdivision (b), periodically as promptly as feasible but shall transmit funds at least once in each calendar quarter.

(2) The department shall furnish a quarterly statement indicating the amounts paid and withheld for expenses of the department.

(d) (1) The amount of three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be loaned from the General Fund to the department during the 2021–22 fiscal year and deposited into the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax Fund for the purpose of implementing the tax imposed by this part and shall be repaid on or before June 30, 2023, from the taxes collected pursuant to this part.

(2) The loan made pursuant
 to this subdivision shall be repaid to the General Fund before any appropriations of funds pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) are made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 46, Sec. 5.   (AB 186)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

31008.

(a) On or before July 1, 2024, the department shall provide a report to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation, the Assembly Committee on Health, the Senate Committee on Health, and the Senate Governance and Finance Committee regarding the effect of collecting the California Electronic Cigarette Excise Tax on the purchase of electronic cigarettes at retail in the state.

 (b) The report required by this section shall include an estimate of retail electronic cigarette purchases to compare to the total purchase price reported under this part for calendar years 2022 and 2023. The estimated retail electronic cigarette purchases shall be calculated using any
 information available to the department, including, but not limited to, the reported wholesale cost of electronic cigarettes as reported under Part 13 (commencing with Section 30001) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 489, Sec. 3.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 13.7. Property Tax Reimbursement Law [31201. - 31203.]

31201.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Property Tax Reimbursement Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31202.

For purposes of this part, all of the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Heavy equipment property” means rental property of a qualified heavy equipment renter.

(b) “Qualified heavy equipment renter” means a renter that satisfies both of the following:

(1) The principal business of the renter is the rental
 of heavy equipment property.

(2) The renter is engaged in a line of business described in Code 532412 or 532310 of the North American Industry Classification System published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 edition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31203.

Any property tax reimbursement collected by a qualified heavy equipment renter shall conform to Section 1656.5 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 505, Sec. 2.   (AB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE TAX [32001. - 32557.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [32001. - 32010.]

32001.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32002.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter and those in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 23000) of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code govern the construction of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 170.)
-------------------------------------------

32003.

“Sale,” as used in Sections 32151 and 32201 of this code, includes, in addition to the definition in Section 23025 of the Business and Professions Code, the transaction whereby alcoholic beverages are transferred, with or without consideration, by a licensee holding one type of license to himself for purposes of sale under a retailer’s license held by him or to any person for any purpose; and the transaction whereby alcoholic beverages are transferred, with or without consideration, by a customs broker to any person within this State except a licensed importer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32004.

“Tax,” as used in this part, except in Chapters 4 (commencing with Section 32151) and 5 (commencing with Section 32201), means the excise tax imposed by this part on beer or wine or on distilled spirits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 171.)
-------------------------------------------

32005.

“Taxpayer,” means a person liable for the payment of a tax pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32006.

The provisions of this part insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions of law relating to the same subject matter shall be construed as restatements and continuations and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32007.

Any action or proceeding commenced before this part takes effect, or any right accrued, is not affected by this part, but all procedure taken shall conform to the provisions of this part as far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32010.

The taxes imposed by this part are in lieu of all county, municipal, or district taxes on the sale of beer, wine, or distilled spirits.

This section does not prohibit the application of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) to the sale, storage, use or other consumption of beer, wine, or distilled spirits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 172.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Exemptions [32051. - 32054.]

32051.

Alcoholic beverages in continuous transit through this State are exempt from the provisions of this part only while in continuous transit through this State in the possession or custody of common carriers. The board may require affidavits of any person on forms prescribed by the board and may require any such shipments to be checked in and checked out at the boundaries of the State. Any person refusing to make the affidavits required or refusing to check in or check out the alcoholic beverages is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32052.

No tax shall be imposed upon the sale of alcohol, distilled spirits, or wine by distilled spirits manufacturers, brandy manufacturers, rectifiers, industrial alcohol dealers, or wine growers for use in the trades, professions, or industries, but not for beverage use. Complete information concerning sales of distilled spirits or wine for use in trades, professions, or industries by persons holding industrial alcohol dealers’ licenses, distilled spirits manufacturers’ licenses, brandy manufacturers’ licenses, rectifiers’ licenses, and wine growers’ licenses shall be reported to the board each month by such licensees on forms prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32053.

Except as provided in Section 23113 of the Business and Professions Code, alcohol or other distilled spirits sold for the uses mentioned in Sections 23111 and 23112 of that code may be sold free of the tax imposed by this part only when sold in packages of a capacity of larger than one gallon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32054.

No tax shall be imposed upon the sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee in this State to a common carrier or to a person licensed to sell alcoholic beverages on boats, trains, or airplanes operated by a common carrier when the alcoholic beverages are to be used without this State; nor in such case need the common carrier procure a license for purposes of purchasing alcoholic beverages from a licensed manufacturer, wine grower, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Registration and Bonds [32101. - 32111.]

32101.

The issuance of any manufacturer’s, winegrower’s, wine blender’s, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s, rectifier’s, wholesaler’s, importer’s, customs broker’s license, or wine direct shipper permit under Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code shall constitute the registration of the person to whom the license or permit is issued as a taxpayer under this part. Upon the issuance of any of these licenses the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall furnish a copy thereof to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 157, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

32102.

The board, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject thereto, to place with it that security as the board may determine, in the form and amount as the board prescribes. Any security in the form of cash, insured deposits in banks and savings and loan institutions, or a bond or bonds duly executed by an admitted surety insurer, payable to the state, conditioned upon faithful performance of all the requirements of this part, and expressly providing for the payment of all license taxes, penalties, and other
 obligations of the person arising out of this part, shall be held in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

32103.

Subject to the limitations provided in this article, the board shall fix the total amount of the security required of any taxpayer and may increase or reduce the amount at any time. In fixing the total amount, the board may set an amount which is not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than twice the taxpayer’s estimated monthly tax for taxpayers reporting monthly, or not more than twice the taxpayer’s estimated tax for the tax reporting period for taxpayers reporting for periods longer than one month ascertained in any manner as the board may
 deem proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1113, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

32104.

Every bond shall contain a provision substantially that when the surety exercises his right to withdraw as surety the withdrawal shall be effective on the first day of the calendar month after receipt of the notice by the board if the notice is received on or before the fifteenth day of the month, otherwise the withdrawal shall be effective on the first day of the second calendar month after receipt of the notice by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32106.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the board setting forth the amount of a taxpayer’s delinquencies, the State Treasurer shall pay to the board the amount so certified from the money deposited with him by the taxpayer or from the amounts received from the sale of bonds or other obligations deposited with the Treasurer by the taxpayer. Securities deposited with the State Treasurer which have a prevailing market price may be sold by him for the purposes of this section at private sale at a price not lower than the prevailing market price thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32107.

Whenever a taxpayer’s bond is canceled, or becomes void or unenforceable for any reason, or whenever a taxpayer fails to pay any taxes or penalties due under this part, the board shall give written notice thereof to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32109.

Any common carrier, except railroad and steamship companies, before engaging in the business of transporting shipments of alcoholic beverages into this State, shall register with the board and make application to the board for an interstate alcoholic beverage transporter’s permit which, upon issuance, shall be valid until revoked by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32110.

Before commencing to transport wine or beer into this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 23661.5 of the Business and Professions Code, the wine or beer manufacturer or producer shall register with the board and make application to the board for a manufacturer’s interstate alcoholic beverage transporter’s permit, which, upon issuance, shall be valid until revoked by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

32111.

Before commencing to transport distilled spirits into this state pursuant to the provisions of Section 23661 of the Business and Professions Code, the distilled spirits manufacturer shall register with the board and make application to the board for a manufacturer’s interstate alcoholic beverage transporter’s permit, which, upon issuance, shall be valid until revoked by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Tax on Beer and Wine [32151. - 32179.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Tax [32151. - 32152.]

32151.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, an excise tax is imposed upon all beer and wine sold in this State or pursuant to Section 23384 of the Business and Professions Code by a manufacturer, wine grower, or importer, or sellers of beer or wine selling beer or wine with respect to which no tax has been paid within areas over which the United States Government exercises jurisdiction, at the following rates:

(a) On all beer, sixty-two cents ($0.62) for every barrel containing 31 gallons and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity until July 1, 1959, and on and after July 1, 1959, one dollar and
 twenty-four cents ($1.24) for every barrel containing 31 gallons and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity.

(b) On all still wines containing not more than 14 percent of absolute alcohol by volume, one cent ($0.01) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity.

(c) On all still wines containing more than 14 percent of absolute alcohol by volume, two cents ($0.02) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity.

(d) On champagne, sparkling wine, excepting sparkling hard cider, whether naturally or artificially carbonated, thirty cents ($0.30) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity.

(e) On sparkling hard cider, two cents ($0.02) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any
 other quantity.

(f) Except with respect to beer in the internal revenue bonded premises of a beer manufacturer, for the privilege of possessing or selling beer on which a tax not greater than at the rate of sixty-two cents ($0.62) per barrel has been paid under this part, a floor stock tax of sixty-two cents ($0.62) per barrel, and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity, is hereby imposed on all beer possessed at 12.01 a.m. on July 1, 1959, by every person licensed under Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code. On or before July 31, 1959, each person subject to the tax imposed by this subdivision shall prepare and file with the board, on a form prescribed by the board, a return showing the amount of beer possessed by him at 12.01 a.m. on July 1, 1959, that is subject to the tax imposed by this subdivision, and such other information as the board deems necessary for the proper administration of this part. The taxpayer shall
 deliver the return, together with a remittance of the amount of tax due, to the office of the board on or before July 31, 1959.

All the provisions of this part relating to excise taxes are applicable also to the tax imposed by this subdivision, to the extent that they are not inconsistent with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

32152.

The board shall adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary to coordinate so far as permitted by the provisions of this part the system of beer and wine taxation imposed by this part with the system of beer and wine taxation imposed by the internal revenue laws of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Presumptions and Exemptions [32171. - 32179.]

32171.

It shall be presumed, for the purposes of this part, that all beer removed from the internal revenue bonded premises of a beer manufacturer has been sold in this State by the manufacturer, unless one of the following is proved to the satisfaction of the board, in reports on forms prescribed by the board:

(a) That the beer has been sold and delivered in internal revenue bond to another beer manufacturer in this State.

(b) That the beer has been exported without this State or sold for export by the beer manufacturer making the report and
 actually exported from this State.

(c) That the beer is beer otherwise exempted from taxation under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

32172.

Beer consumed by employees of a manufacturer upon the premises of the manufacturer is exempted from the tax under such rules as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32173.

It shall be presumed, for the purposes of this part, that all wine removed from a winery or wine cellar bonded under the internal revenue laws of the United States on payment of the internal revenue tax by a wine grower has been sold in this State by the wine grower, unless it is proved to the satisfaction of the board, in reports on forms prescribed by the board, that the wine has been exported from this State or sold for export by the wine grower making the report and actually exported from this State or that the wine is otherwise exempt from taxation under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

32174.

No tax is imposed by this part upon any wine sold or delivered in internal revenue bond to another wine grower in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32175.

It shall be presumed, for the purposes of this part, that all beer and wine imported into this State by a beer manufacturer or wine grower or importer has been sold in this State at the time it is received by the licensee, unless it is proved to the satisfaction of the board, on forms prescribed by the board, that the beer or wine is still in the possession of the beer manufacturer or the wine grower in internal revenue bond within this State, or has been exported from this State by the licensee making the report or has been sold by him for export and actually exported from this State, or is otherwise exempt under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------

32176.

(a) If taxes have been paid on beer or wine subsequently exported from the state or sold for export and actually thereafter exported from this state, or on beer or wine subsequently destroyed under the supervision of a board representative, a taxpayer may claim and shall be allowed credit with respect to the taxes in any report filed or assessment made under this part.

(b) A beer manufacturer located in this state may claim and shall be allowed a credit for excise taxes
 paid on tax paid beer returned by a licensed wholesaler and subsequently destroyed by the beer manufacturer under the supervision of a board representative. The credit shall be allowed only if the beer manufacturer has credited the licensed wholesaler the amount of the tax. If the credit is allowed to the beer manufacturer, a credit shall not be allowed to the licensed wholesaler with respect to the destruction of the same product.

(c) A winegrower may claim credit with respect to excise taxes on wine purchased state tax paid from another winegrower and subsequently exported or sold for export and actually exported.

(d) A beer manufacturer or a beer and wine wholesaler may claim credit for excise taxes on beer purchased state tax paid and subsequently exported or sold for export and actually exported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32177.5.

No tax shall be imposed upon the sale of distilled spirits by brandy manufacturers, distilled spirits manufacturers, rectifiers, importers, and distilled spirits wholesalers to the following listed instrumentalities of the armed forces of the United States organized under Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard regulations and located upon territory within the geographical boundaries of the state:

(a) Army, Air Force, Navy, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard exchanges.

(b) Officers’, noncommissioned officers’, and enlisted persons’ clubs or messes.

If any manufacturer, rectifier, importer or wholesaler has paid the tax on alcoholic beverages, except beer and wine, thereafter sold to an instrumentality of the Armed Forces so located, the taxpayer may claim and shall be allowed credit with respect to the tax so paid in any report filed or assessment paid under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 47.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32178.

Any wine grower may claim and shall be allowed credit in any tax report filed or assessment made under this part with respect to the tax paid by him on wine sold to a wine rectifier and which has been exported from this State by the wine rectifier or sold for export by the wine rectifier and thereafter actually exported from this State. The board shall make rules prescribing the procedure for claiming and allowance of the credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32179.

Any claim for exemption from taxes under this article shall be made to the board in such manner as the board shall prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 322.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Tax on Distilled Spirits [32201. - 32214.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Tax [32201. - 32203.]

32201.

An excise tax is imposed upon all distilled spirits sold in this state or pursuant to Section 23384 of the Business and Professions Code by manufacturers, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents, brandy manufacturers, rectifiers, or wholesalers, or sellers of distilled spirits selling distilled spirits with respect to which no tax has been paid within areas over which the federal government exercises jurisdiction, at the following rates:

On all distilled spirits of proof strength or less, two dollars ($2) per wine gallon, and at a proportionate rate for any quantity, and on all nonliquid distilled spirits containing 50 percent
 or less alcohol by weight two cents ($0.02) per ounce avoirdupois, and at a proportionate rate for any quantity.

All distilled spirits in excess of proof strength, and all nonliquid distilled spirits containing more than 50 percent alcohol by weight, shall be taxed at double the above rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 827.)
-------------------------------------------

32202.

An excise tax is levied on sales made in this state of distilled spirits by common carriers on board boats, trains, and airplanes, or by persons licensed to sell distilled spirits on board such boats, trains, and airplanes, at the same rates as set forth in Section 32201. On or before the first day of each month such common carriers and such other licensed persons shall forward to the board a report of the sales of distilled spirits so made in the calendar month preceding the previous calendar month, in such detail and form as the board may prescribe and shall be filed using electronic media together with a payment
 sufficient to pay the tax on the sales.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 44.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

32203.

The board shall from time to time make examinations to determine the accuracy of the reports of sales submitted by common carriers and by persons licensed to sell distilled spirits on board boats and trains operated by common carriers. The board may make such rules for the enforcement of the provisions of Section 32202 as it deems necessary to adequately insure the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Presumptions and Exemptions [32211. - 32214.]

32211.

It shall be presumed that all distilled spirits acquired by any taxpayer have been sold in this State by him unless one of the following is proved to the satisfaction of the board, in reports on forms prescribed by the board:

(a) That the distilled spirits are still in the possession of the licensee.

(b) That the distilled spirits have been sold or delivered to another licensed distilled spirits manufacturer, rectifier, importer, or wholesaler.

(c) That the distilled spirits have
 been exported without this State or sold for export by the licensee making the report and actually exported from this State within 90 days from the date of the sale.

(d) That prior to the termination of possession the distilled spirits have been lost through unintentional destruction.

(e) That prior to the termination of possession there has been an unaccounted for loss, but the unaccounted for loss shall not exceed a tolerance to be fixed by the board.

(f) That the distilled spirits are otherwise exempt from taxation under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32212.

The tax is not imposed upon any distilled spirits specifically mentioned in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 32211.

The tax is not imposed upon the sale of brandy to a licensee of another state pursuant to the provisions of Section 23108 of the Business and Professions Code.

Any claim for exemption from taxes under Section 32211 shall be made to the board in such manner as the board shall prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32213.

Whenever distilled spirits are sold by manufacturers, rectifiers, importers, or wholesalers to common carriers engaged in interstate or foreign passenger service for use or sale by the carriers partly within the State and partly without the State on board boats, trains, or airplanes, or to persons licensed to sell distilled spirits on board such boats, trains, or airplanes, the tax shall not be levied on the sales made by manufacturers, rectifiers, importers, or wholesalers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32214.

If taxes have been paid on distilled spirits sold to a person who holds a permit and identification number authorizing the filing of a claim for drawback of federal distilled spirits excise taxes under the Federal Non-Beverage Drawback Regulations and the distilled spirits have been used in the manufacture of food products, the taxpayer may claim and shall be allowed credit with respect to the taxes in any report or return made under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Surtax on Beer, Wine,and Distilled Spirits [32220. - 32230.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of the Surtax [32220. - 32223.]

32220.

On and after July 15, 1991, an excise surtax is hereby imposed upon all beer and wine sold in this state by a manufacturer, winegrower, or importer, and upon all distilled spirits sold in this state by a manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, brandy manufacturer, winegrower, importer, rectifier, wholesaler, common carrier with respect to distilled spirits sales made upon boats, trains, and airplanes, or persons licensed to sell distilled spirits upon boats, trains, and airplanes, and upon sellers of beer, wine, or distilled spirits with respect to which no tax has been paid within areas over which the United
 States government exercises jurisdiction, at the following rates:

(a) On all beer, sixteen cents ($0.16) per gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity. 

(b) On all still wines containing not more than 14 percent of absolute alcohol by volume, nineteen cents ($0.19) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity. 

(c) On all still wines containing more than 14 percent of absolute alcohol by volume, eighteen cents ($0.18) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity. 

(d) On sparkling hard cider, eighteen cents ($0. 18) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity. 

(e) On all distilled spirits of proof strength
 or less, one dollar and thirty cents ($1.30) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity. 

(f) On all distilled spirits in excess of proof strength, two dollars and sixty cents ($2.60) per wine gallon and at a proportionate rate for any other quantity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 88, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

32221.
